Utah statutes.
17D-1-301.   Governance of a special service district -- Authority to create
and delegate authority to an administrative control board -- Limitations on
authority to delegate.
(1)  Each special service district shall be governed by the legislative body
of the county or municipality that creates the special service district,
subject to any delegation under this section of a right, power, or authority
to an administrative control board.
(2)  At the time a special service district is created or at any time
thereafter, the legislative body of a county or municipality that creates a
special service district may, by resolution or ordinance:
(a)  create an administrative control board for the special service district;
and
(b)  subject to Subsection (3), delegate to the administrative control board
the exercise of any right, power, or authority that the legislative body
possesses with respect to the governance of the special service district.
(3)  A county or municipal legislative body may not delegate to an
administrative control board of a special service district the power to:
(a)  annex an area to an existing special service district or add a service
within the area of an existing special service district under Part 4, Annexing
a New Area and Adding a New Service;
(b)  designate, under Section 17D-1-107, the classes of special service
district contracts that are subject to Title 11, Chapter 39, Building
Improvements and Public Works Projects;
(c)  levy a tax on the taxable property within the special service district;
(d)  issue special service district bonds payable from taxes;
(e)  call or hold an election for the authorization of a property tax or the
issuance of bonds;
(f)  levy an assessment;
(g)  issue interim warrants or bonds payable from an assessment; or
(h)  appoint a board of equalization under Section 11-42-403.
(4) (a)  A county or municipal legislative body that has delegated a right,
power, or authority under this section to an administrative control board may
at any time modify, limit, or revoke any right, power, or authority delegated
to the administrative control board.
(b)  A modification, limitation, or revocation under Subsection (4)(a) does
not affect the validity of an action taken by an administrative control board
before the modification, limitation, or revocation.
